Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.620

Cannabis research licensee reports.

Reports submitted by cannabis research licensees in accordance with rules adopted by the state liquor and cannabis board under RCW 69.50.372 that contain proprietary information are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 16 s 29; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1504; 2015 c 71 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Intent—Effective dates—2015 2nd sp.s. c 4: See notes following RCW 69.50.334.